Wisconsin, session 2025, AB648.
do enact as follows:AB648,11Section 1. 20.005 (3) (schedule) of the statutes: at the appropriate place, 2insert the following amounts for the purposes indicated: - See PDF for table AB648,28Section 2. 20.255 (2) (bq) of the statutes is created to read:AB648,2,11920.255 (2) (bq) Supplemental state aid for consolidated school districts. The 10amounts in the schedule for payments to consolidated school districts under s. 11121.134.AB648,312Section 3. 121.134 of the statutes is created to read:AB648,3,21121.134 Supplemental state aid; consolidated school districts. (1) In 2this section:AB648,3,43(a) “Consolidated school district” means a school district created by a 4consolidation under s. 117.08 or 117.09 that takes effect on or after July 1, 2026.AB648,3,65(b) “Levy rate” means the total amount of property taxes levied by a school 6district divided by the school district’s equalized valuation.AB648,3,87(c) “Underlying school district” means a school district that is consolidated to 8create a consolidated school district.AB648,3,109(2) The department shall determine whether a consolidated school district is 10eligible for aid under this section as follows:AB648,3,1211(a) Calculate the levy rate for each underlying school district in the school 12year prior to the school year in which the consolidation takes effect.AB648,3,1313(b) Identify the lowest levy rate calculated under par. (a).AB648,3,1714(c) Calculate the levy rate for the consolidated school district for the school 15year in which the consolidation takes effect, assuming that the consolidated school 16district will levy the maximum amount allowable under s. 121.91 for that school 17year and will not receive aid under this section for that school year.AB648,3,1918(d) If the levy rate under par. (c) is equal to or less than the levy rate under 19par. (b), the consolidated school district is not eligible for aid under this section.AB648,3,2120(e) If the levy rate under par. (c) is more than the levy rate under par. (b), the 21consolidated school district is eligible for aid under this section.AB648,3,2322(3) Subject to sub. (4), the department shall pay a consolidated school district 23that is determined to be eligible for aid under sub. (2) (e), the following amounts:AB648,4,21(a) In the school year in which the consolidation takes effect, an amount 2calculated as follows:AB648,4,431. Subtract the levy rate identified under sub. (2) (b) from the levy rate 4determined under sub. (2) (c).AB648,4,752. Multiply the amount determined under subd. 1. by the consolidated school 6district’s equalized valuation for the school year in which the consolidation takes 7effect.AB648,4,98(b) In the school year following the school year in which the consolidation 9takes effect, 80 percent of the amount determined under par. (a).AB648,4,1110(c) In the 2nd school year following the school year in which the consolidation 11takes effect, 60 percent of the amount determined under par. (a).AB648,4,1312(d) In the 3rd school year following the school year in which the consolidation 13takes effect, 40 percent of the amount determined under par. (a).AB648,4,1514(e) In the 4th school year following the school year in which the consolidation 15takes effect, 20 percent of the amount determined under par. (a).AB648,4,1816(4) If the amount appropriated for aid under this section in any fiscal year is 17insufficient to pay the full amount under sub. (3), the department shall prorate the 18payments among the consolidated school districts entitled to aid under this section.AB648,419Section 4. 121.90 (2) (am) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:AB648,4,2220121.90 (2) (am) 1. Aid under ss. 121.08, 121.09, 121.105, 121.134, and 121.136 21and subch. VI, as calculated for the current school year on October 15 under s. 22121.15 (4) and including adjustments made under s. 121.15 (4).AB648,4,2323